test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ngudiTS_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - ӈуда: # Noun 'hand /(fin) käsi' - full paradigm /Type 15 a→yi/
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom: ӈуда
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Acc: ӈудамʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Gen: ӈудаʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Dat: ӈуданʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Loc: ӈудахана
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Abl: ӈудахад
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Pros: ӈудавна
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom: ӈудахаʼ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Acc: ӈудахаʼ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Gen: ӈудахаʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom: ӈудаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Acc: ӈуди
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Gen: ӈудиˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Dat: ӈудахаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Loc: ӈудахаˮна
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Abl: ӈудахат
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Pros: ӈудиˮмана
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈудав, ӈудами]
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈудав, ӈудами]
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈудан, ӈудани]
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [ӈудахан, ӈудахани]
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [ӈудаханан, ӈудаханани]
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [ӈудахадан, ӈудахадани, ӈудахадни]
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [ӈудавнан, ӈудавнани]
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈудахаюн, ӈудахаюни]
     ӈуда+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈудахаюн, ӈудахаюни]
     ӈуда+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈудахаюн, ӈудахаюни]
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈудин, ӈудини]
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈудин, ӈудини]
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈудиˮн, ӈудиˮни]
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [ӈудахаˮн, ӈудахаˮни]
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [ӈудахаˮнан, ӈудахаˮнани]
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [ӈудахатан, ӈудахатани, ӈудахатни]
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [ӈудиˮманан, ӈудиˮманани]
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ӈудар
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: ӈудамд
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ӈуданд
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: ӈудаханд
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: ӈудахананд
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: ӈудахаданд
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: ӈудавнанд
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: ӈудахаюд
     ӈуда+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: ӈудахаюд
     ӈуда+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: ӈудахают
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ӈудид
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: ӈудид
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: ӈудит
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: ӈудахат
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: ӈудахаˮнат
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: ӈудахатат
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: ӈудиˮманат
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ӈудада
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: ӈудамда
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ӈуданда
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ӈудаханда
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: ӈудахананда
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: ӈудахаданда
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: ӈудавнанда
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: ӈудахаюда
     ӈуда+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: ӈудахаюда
     ӈуда+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: ӈудахаюта
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ӈудида
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: ӈудида
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ӈудита
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: ӈудахата
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: ӈудахаˮната
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [ӈудахатата, ӈудахатта]
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: ӈудиˮманата
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: ӈудамиʼ
#     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: ӈудами
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: ӈудамиʼ
#     ӈуда+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: ӈудами
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ӈуданиʼ
#     ӈуда+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: ӈудани
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: ӈудаханиʼ
#     ӈуда+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: ӈудахани
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: ӈудахананиʼ
#     ӈуда+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: ӈудаханани
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [ӈудахаданиʼ, ӈудахадниʼ]
#     ӈуда+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: [ӈудахадани, ӈудахадни]
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: ӈудавнаниʼ
#     ӈуда+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: ӈудавнани
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: ӈудахаюниʼ
#     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: ӈудахаюни
     ӈуда+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: ӈудахаюниʼ
#     ӈуда+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: ӈудахаюни
     ӈуда+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: ӈудахаюниʼ
#     ӈуда+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: ӈудахаюни
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: ӈудиниʼ
#     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: ӈудини
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: ӈудиниʼ
#     ӈуда+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: ӈудини
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: ӈудиˮниʼ
#     ӈуда+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: ӈудиˮни
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: ӈудахаˮниʼ
#     ӈуда+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: ӈудахаˮни
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: ӈудахаˮнаниʼ
#     ӈуда+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: ӈудахаˮнани
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [ӈудахатаниʼ, ӈудахатниʼ]
#     ӈуда+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: [ӈудахатани, ӈудахатни]
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: ӈудиˮмананиʼ
#     ӈуда+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: ӈудиˮманани
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: ӈудариʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: ӈудамдиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: ӈудандиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: ӈудахандиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: ӈудаханандиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: ӈудахадандиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: ӈудавнандиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: ӈудахаюдиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: ӈудахаюдиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: ӈудахаютиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: ӈудидиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: ӈудидиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: ӈудитиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: ӈудахатиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: ӈудахаˮнатиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [ӈудахататиʼ, ӈудахаттиʼ]
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: ӈудиˮманатиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: ӈудадиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: ӈудамдиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: ӈудандиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: ӈудахандиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: ӈудаханандиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: ӈудахадандиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: ӈудавнандиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: ӈудахаюдиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: ӈудахаюдиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: ӈудахаютиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: ӈудидиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: ӈудидиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: ӈудитиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: ӈудахатиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: ӈудахаˮнатиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [ӈудахататиʼ, ӈудахаттиʼ]
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: ӈудиˮманатиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ӈудаваˮ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: ӈудаваˮ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: ӈуданаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: ӈудаханаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: ӈудахананаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [ӈудахаданаˮ, ӈудахаднаˮ]
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: ӈудавнанаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: ӈудахаюнаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: ӈудахаюнаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: ӈудахаюнаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: ӈудинаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: ӈудинаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: ӈудиˮнаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: ӈудахаˮнаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: ӈудахаˮнанаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [ӈудахатанаˮ, ӈудахатнаˮ]
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: ӈудиˮмананаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ӈудараˮ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: ӈудамдаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: ӈудандаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: ӈудахандаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: ӈудаханандаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: ӈудахадандаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: ӈудавнандаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: ӈудахаюдаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: ӈудахаюдаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: ӈудахаютаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: ӈудидаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: ӈудидаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: ӈудитаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: ӈудахатаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: ӈудахаˮнатаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [ӈудахататаˮ, ӈудахаттаˮ]
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: ӈудиˮманатаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ӈудадоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: ӈудамдоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: ӈудандоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: ӈудахандоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: ӈудаханандоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: ӈудахадандоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: ӈудавнандоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: ӈудахаюдоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: ӈудахаюдоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: ӈудахаютоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: ӈудидоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: ӈудидоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: ӈудитоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: ӈудахатоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: ӈудахаˮнатоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [ӈудахататоʼ, ӈудахаттоʼ]
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: ӈудиˮманатоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Abs: ӈудад
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈудадав, ӈудадув, ӈудадами]
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈудадав, ӈудадув, ӈудадами]
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈудадан, ӈудадани]
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: ӈудадар
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: ӈудадамд
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: ӈудаданд
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: ӈудадада
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: ӈудадамда
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: ӈудаданда
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: ӈудадамиʼ
#     ӈуда+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: ӈудадами
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: ӈудадамиʼ
#     ӈуда+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: ӈудадами
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: ӈудаданиʼ
#     ӈуда+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: ӈудадани
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: ӈудадариʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: ӈудадамдиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: ӈудадандиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: ӈудададиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: ӈудадамдиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: ӈудадандиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: ӈудадаваˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: ӈудадаваˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: ӈудаданаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: ӈудадараˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: ӈудадамдаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: ӈудадандаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: ӈудададоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: ӈудадамдоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: ӈудадандоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: ӈудадмʼ
     ӈуда+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ӈудан
     ӈуда+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈуда
     ӈуда+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: ӈуданиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: ӈудадиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈудахаʼ
     ӈуда+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: ӈудаваˮ
     ӈуда+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: ӈудадаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈудаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: ӈудадамзь
     ӈуда+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: ӈуданась
     ӈуда+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈудась
     ӈуда+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: ӈуданинзь
     ӈуда+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: ӈудадинзь
     ӈуда+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈудаханзь
     ӈуда+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: ӈудаваць
     ӈуда+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: ӈудадаць
     ӈуда+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈудаць
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈудав
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈудар
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈудада
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈудамиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈудариʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈудадиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈудаваˮ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈудараˮ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈудадоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈудавась
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈударась
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈудадась
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈудаминзь
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈударинзь
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈудадинзь
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈудаваць
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈудараць
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈудадонзь
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈудахаюн
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈудахаюд
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈудахаюда
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈудахаюниʼ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈудахаюдиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈудахаюдиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈудахаюнаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈудахаюдаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈудахаюдоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈудахаюнась
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈудахаюдась
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈудахаюдась
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈудахаюнинзь
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈудахаюдинзь
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈудахаюдинзь
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈудахаюнаць
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈудахаюдаць
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈудахаюдонзь
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈудин
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈудид
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈудида
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈудиниʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈудидиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈудидиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈудинаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈудидаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈудидоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈудинась
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈудидась
